District of Columbia statutes.
31-1206

Insurers and health maintenance organizations continuing obligations.

Any insurer or health maintenance organization whose license has been revoked, cancelled, terminated, or surrendered shall continue to be bound by the obligations of this chapter including payment of all assessments, regardless of whether the insurer or health maintenance organization continues to do business in the District of Columbia.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 7, 40 DCR 6009
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 24(j), 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-2706.